Hawaii statutes.
[§23-77] Review for 2023 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions or exclusions under the general
excise and use taxes listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2023 and
every tenth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular
session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 237-24.3(2)--Reimbursements to
associations of owners of condominium property regimes or nonprofit homeowners
or community associations for common expenses;

(2) Section 237-24.5--Amounts received by exchanges
or exchange members;

(3) Section 237-25(a)(3)--Gross income received from
tangible personal property sales to state-chartered credit unions;

(4) Section 237-24.8--Amounts received by financial
institutions, trust companies, trust departments, or financial corporations
acting as interbank brokers;

(5) Section 237-26--Gross proceeds of scientific
contractors and subcontractors;

(6) Section 238-3(j)--The value of property or
services exempted by section 237-26, relating to scientific contracts; and

(7) Section 237-27--Amounts received by petroleum
product refiners from other refiners. [L 2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next